Wisconsin, session 2025, AB693.
do enact as follows:AB693,13Section 1. 29.539 (1m) (n) of the statutes is created to read:AB693,1,4429.539 (1m) (n) A deer to which all of the following apply:AB693,2,211. It is lawfully taken in the central farmland zone or southern farmland zone, 2as shown in s. NR 10.28 (4), Wis. Adm. Code.AB693,2,632. It is offered, in exchange for one or more gift cards or gift certificates to local 4businesses, to a meat processing facility that agrees to process the deer and that 5agrees to provide the processed meat to a food distribution service, as defined in s. 6895.51 (1) (c).AB693,2,77